Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 1 General Provisions
37-5-121. Pilot programs — Evidence-based programs for the prevention, treatment or care of delinquent juveniles.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Evidence-based” means policies, procedures, programs, and practices demonstrated by scientific research to reliably produce reductions in recidivism or has been rated as effective by a standardized program evaluation tool;

“Pilot program” means a temporary research-based or theory-based program or project that is eligible for funding from any source to determine whether or not evidence supports its continuation beyond the fixed evaluation period. A pilot program shall provide for and include:

Development of a program manual or protocol that specifies the nature, quality, and amount of service that constitutes the program; and

Scientific research using methods that meet high scientific standards for evaluating the effects of such programs must demonstrate on at least an annual basis whether or not the program improves client outcomes central to the purpose of the program;

“Research-based” means a program or practice that has some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the standard of evidence-based; and

“Theory-based” means a program or practice that has general support among treatment providers and experts, based on experience or professional literature, may have anecdotal or case-study support, and has potential for becoming a research-based program or practice.

The department of children's services, and any other state agency that administers funds related to the prevention, treatment or care of delinquent juveniles, shall not expend state funds on any juvenile justice program or program related to the prevention, treatment or care of delinquent juveniles, including any service model or delivery system in any form or by any name, unless the program is evidence-based. The department shall continue the ongoing research and evaluation of sound, theory-based and research-based programs with the goal of identifying and expanding the number and type of available evidence-based programs, and to that end the department may engage in and fund pilot programs as defined in this section.

Implementation of programs shall be accompanied by monitoring and quality control procedures designed to ensure that they are delivered as prescribed in the applicable program manual or protocol and that corrective action shall be taken when those standards are not met.

The department shall include in any contract with a provider of services related to prevention, treatment or care of delinquent juveniles a provision affirming that the provider shall provide only evidence-based services, except for services that are being provided pursuant to a pilot program as defined in this section, and that the services shall be accompanied by monitoring and quality control procedures that ensure that they are delivered according to the applicable standards. The department may use performance requirements or incentives in determining the amounts payable in contracts or grants.

In order to prevent undue disturbance to existing department programs, the department shall ensure that twenty-five percent (25%) of the funds expended for delinquent juveniles meet the requirements of this section during fiscal year 2009-2010, that fifty percent (50%) of such funds meet the requirements of this section during fiscal year 2010-2011, that seventy-five percent (75%) of such funds meet the requirements of this section during fiscal year 2011-2012, and that one hundred percent (100%) of such funds meet the requirements of this section during fiscal year 2012-2013 and each fiscal year thereafter.

The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2007, ch. 585, §§ 1-3; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(s); 2018, ch. 1052, § 53.

Compiler's Notes. Former §37-5-121 (Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 183), concerning the Tennessee Preparatory School, was repealed by Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 25, effective June 16, 2003.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote (a)(1) which read:“(1) ‘Evidence-based’ means a program or practice that meets the following requirements:“(A) The program or practice is governed by a program manual or protocol that specifies the nature, quality, and amount of service that constitutes the program; and“(B) Scientific research using methods that meet high scientific standards for evaluating the effects of such programs must have demonstrated with two (2) or more separate client samples that the program improves client outcomes central to the purpose of the program;”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

37-5-122. Post-adoption services and searches — Fees and charges.

The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations establishing procedures, fees and charges for any service rendered relative to post-adoption search services and records handling services that are at any time required or permitted by law to be provided by the department.

The commissioner is empowered to promulgate rules and regulations to reduce or eliminate fees or charges for services, identified under the provisions of this section, based upon recipients' condition or ability to pay. The amount of any fee or charge established by the commissioner under the provisions of this section shall not exceed the cost of providing the service.

Any fees or charges received by the department under this section shall be deposited with the state treasurer in accordance with § 9-4-301.

Acts 1992, ch. 901, § 1; 1995, ch. 532, § 17; T.C.A., §71-1-124; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 156.

37-5-123. Notification of release of juvenile offender.

The department of children's services shall provide or contract with a private entity to provide to members of the public who have made a notification request, notification of the release of a juvenile adjudicated to have committed a delinquent act that would constitute a felony if committed by an adult from a facility operated by or under contract with the department to home placement as defined in § 37-1-102 [See compiler's note]. The chief administrator, or a person designated by the chief administrator, of a facility operated under contract with the department shall make available to the department, or any private entity under contract with the department, the information necessary to implement this section in a timely manner. The department, or the private entity under contract with the department, shall be responsible for retrieving the information and notifying the requester in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department.

The department may refuse the notification request of a person if, on a case by case basis, it finds that notification of release is not in the best interests of the juvenile being released and that such notification may result in harm to the juvenile.

The department shall promulgate rules in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to implement the provisions of this section.

Notwithstanding §§ 37-1-145, 37-1-155 or 37-5-107 to the contrary, this section shall require the release of information relating to juveniles who have been adjudicated to have committed a delinquent act that would constitute a felony if committed by an adult. The release of information shall be limited to the extent necessary to comply with the provisions of this section.

Acts 1998, ch. 968, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1998, ch. 968, § 3 provided full implementation of the notification program established by this act and full public access to such information shall take place by July 1, 1999.

The definition of “home placement”, as referenced in the first sentence of subdivision (a)(1), was deleted from section 37-1-102 by Acts 2011, ch. 486, § 1 effective July 1, 2011.

37-5-124. Disclosure of the death or near fatality of persons in the custody of the department of children's services.

The commissioner of children's services shall provide a report of the fatality or near fatality of:

Any child in the custody of the department;

Any child who is the subject of an ongoing investigation by child protective services or has been the subject of an investigation by child protective services within the forty-five (45) days immediately preceding the child's fatality or near fatality; or

Any child whose fatality or near fatality resulted in an investigation of the safety and well-being of another child in the home;

within ten (10) business days of the fatality or near fatality of such child to the members of the senate and house of representatives representing the child and to the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families. The district attorney for the judicial district in which the child was located must also receive a copy of the report provided to the legislators and may communicate with the legislators representing the child about the report and its contents or about any other otherwise confidential information that the legislators may have acquired pursuant to §37-5-107(d).

The legislators representing the child shall be determined by the home address of the child. If the child was not a resident of Tennessee prior to being placed in the custody of the department, the legislators representing the child shall be determined by the address of the residence or facility in which the child was located at the time of the child's fatality or near fatality.

For the purposes of this section, “near fatality” shall have the same meaning as in § 37-5-107.

Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 2; 2010, ch. 1031, § 1; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(t); 2019, ch. 345, § 44; 2019, ch. 472, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by ch. 345 added “and to the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families” at the end of (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 472 added the last sentence in (a)(3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 472, § 2. May 24, 2019.

Cross-References. Disclosure of the death of persons in the custody of the department of correction, §4-3-611.

37-5-125. Model programs for adolescents at risk.

Through contract with nonprofit corporations, community organizations, volunteer groups, churches, schools and family resource centers, the department of children's services is authorized to establish in each grand division two (2) model after school or summer programs, or both, for young adolescents at risk of placement in the custody of the state. An entity may contract with the department to operate more than one (1) program. Each such model program shall serve not more than twenty-five (25) adolescents and shall strive to improve self-esteem, motivation, responsibility, achievement and goal setting through a variety of activities including, but not necessarily limited to, counseling, tutoring, mentoring, field trips, cultural enrichment experiences, team sports and team projects and problem solving. State funding for each such model program shall not exceed eight thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($8,250) per program.

The department shall promulgate policies and guidelines defining:

The phrase “young adolescents at risk of placement in the custody of the state;” and

The minimum requirements and components for programs established and funded pursuant to subsection (a).

On or before January 15 of each year, the department shall evaluate the success of such programs and shall report findings and recommendations to the judiciary committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families.

Acts 1993, ch. 246, § 1; 1994, ch. 793, § 1; 1994, ch. 917, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, § 16; T.C.A. §4-3-2626; Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 3(u); 2013, ch. 236, § 21; 2019, ch. 345, § 45.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §4-3-2626, concerning model programs for adolescents at risk, was transferred without change to this section in 2005 by authority of the Tennessee code commission.

This section was amended twice in 1994, first by ch. 793, effective April 15, 1994, then by ch. 917, effective July 1, 1994, neither act referring to the other. The amendments conflict in (a), which is set out to reflect the amendment by ch. 917. The amendment by ch. 793 would have substituted “thirty-five (35) adolescents” for “twenty-five adolescents.”

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 184 provided:

“Any provision of this act, or the application thereof, which is inconsistent with federal law, rule or regulation shall be deemed to be construed as being consistent with federal law, rule or regulation.”

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families” for “the civil justice committee of the house of representatives” in (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

37-5-126. Children's mental health care — Development of plan, projects and programs.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department shall assist the council on children's mental health care in developing a plan that will establish demonstration sites in certain geographic areas where children's mental health care is child-centered, family-driven, and culturally and linguistically competent and that provides a coordinated system of care for children's mental health needs in this state. The department shall also involve the council in the development of interagency projects and programs, whether state or federally funded, related to children's mental health care, except where otherwise prohibited by state or federal law.

Acts 2008, ch. 1062, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding to the mental health needs of Tennessee's children and youth, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1062.

37-5-127. License, certification or registration — Notifications — Prerequisites — Web site — Electronic notices.

The department and each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall notify each applicant for a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, board, commission, agency or other governmental entity where to obtain a copy of any statutes, rules, guidelines, and policies setting forth the prerequisites for the license, certification or registration and shall, upon request, make available to the applicant a copy of the statutes, rules, guidelines, and policies.

The department and each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall notify each holder of a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the board, commission, agency or other governmental entity of changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines, upon the issuance and upon each renewal of a holder's license, certification or registration.

The department and each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall establish and maintain a link or links on the entity's web site to the statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines that are implemented or enforced by the entity and that impact an applicant for, or a holder of, a professional or occupational license, certification, or registration from the entity.

The department and each board, commission, agency, or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall allow each holder of a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, board, commission, agency or other governmental entity to have the option of being notified by electronic mail of:

Renewals of the holder's license, certification or registration;

Any fee increases;

Any changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies and guidelines; and

Any meeting where changes in rules or fees are on the agenda. For purposes of this subdivision (d)(1)(D), the electronic notice shall be at least forty-five (45) days in advance of the meeting, unless it is an emergency meeting then the notice shall be sent as soon as is practicable.

The department and each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall notify each holder of a license, certification or registration of the availability of receiving electronic notices pursuant to subdivision (d)(1) upon issuance or renewal of the holder's license, certification or registration.

Acts 2008, ch. 1070, § 10; 2012, ch. 952, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1070, § 13 provided that each entity subject to the act shall promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

37-5-128. Review of department policies and attached protocol and procedures that affect children the department serves — Uniformity of applicability.

Before March 1 of each year, the department shall appear before the judiciary committee of the senate and the judiciary committee of the house of representatives for a review of the policies of the department and attached protocol and procedures for these policies and any provisions that affect the children the department serves. During the review, the committees shall consider the uniformity of applicability across the state of the department's policies and attached protocol and procedures for these policies and any provisions that affect the children the department serves.

Acts 2009, ch. 87, § 2; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(v); 2013, ch. 236, § 21; 2019, ch. 345, § 46.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “judiciary” for “civil justice” following “senate and the”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

37-5-129. Review of new departmental policies.

The department shall submit for review by the judiciary committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families any new departmental policies within sixty (60) days of adoption of the policies.

Acts 2009, ch. 87, § 2; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(w); 2013, ch. 236, § 21; 2019, ch. 345, § 47.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families” for “the civil justice committee of the house of representatives”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

37-5-130. Cessation of operations — Permanent education records.

In the event that a department of children's services provider agency school ceases operations, or the department no longer contracts with the provider agency, the permanent educational records for students who have been in state custody shall be forwarded to the department by the contract agency or provider. Such records shall be maintained in accordance with department policies and procedures as to educational records, and may be released to appropriate individuals or entities in accordance with department policy.

Acts 2010, ch. 738, § 1.

37-5-131. Education of youth in juvenile detention facilities of the department of children's services or other facilities for youth at risk.

This section shall apply to the following facilities:

Juvenile detention facilities approved, certified or licensed by the department of children's services; and

Facilities for children who are not in the custody of the department of children's services that provide community-based alternative educational programs whose purposes are prevention of delinquency, rehabilitation of delinquent youth or otherwise addressing unruly behavior that places youth at risk educationally or at risk of coming into state custody.

Each facility shall report no later than August 31, 2010, to the department of education the number of youth detained or served, as well as relevant demographic and service delivery information as specified by the department of education, including, but not limited to, date of entry and date of exit from the facility for the time period of July 1, 2008, through June 30, 2010.

On or before January 15, 2011, the department of education shall provide a report containing a compilation of the data and a detailed analysis of the findings to the chair of the judiciary committee of the senate, the chair of the children and family affairs committee of the house of representatives, the executive director of the commission on children and youth, the chairs of the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives and the commissioner of children's services. Such report shall include, but not be limited to, the following recommendations:

A process to properly determine and direct the allocation of BEP funding for the purpose of education of youth in these facilities; and

A process to ensure grades and attendance records are transferable between local education agencies and these facilities.

The state board of education, in consultation with the department of children's services and the department of education, shall develop or modify curriculum-based standards, as necessary, for the education of children in these facilities consistent with those applicable to all other school systems.

Acts 2010, ch. 870, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(x).

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

37-5-132. Case managers — Caseloads — Maximum caseload ratios.

The department shall maintain staffing levels of case managers so that each region has enough case managers to allow caseloads not to exceed an average of:

Twenty (20) active cases relating to initial assessments, including investigations of an allegation of child abuse or neglect; or

Twenty (20) children monitored and supervised in active cases relating to ongoing services.

The department shall comply with the maximum caseload ratios described in subsection (a).

Acts 2018, ch. 562, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 562, § 2. July 1, 2018.